Georgia, session 2025_26, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to the authority of subsection (b) of Code Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A., the
governing authority of Hancock County is authorized to levy an excise tax at a rate not to
exceed 8 percent of the charge for the furnishing for value to the public of any room or
rooms, lodgings, or accommodations furnished by any person or legal entity licensed by, or
required to pay business or occupation taxes to, the county for operating a hotel, motel, inn,
lodge, tourist camp, tourist cabin, campground, or any other place in which rooms, lodgings,
or accommodations are regularly or periodically furnished for value.
S. B. 349
- 1 -

LC 47 3624
SECTION 2.
The enactment of this Act is subsequent to the adoption of a resolution by the governing
authority of Hancock County, which specifies the subsequent tax rate, identifies the projects
or tourism product development purposes, and specifies the allocation of proceeds.
SECTION 3.
In accordance with the terms of such resolution adopted by the governing authority of
Hancock County:
(1) In each fiscal year during which a tax is collected pursuant to paragraph (3) of
subsection (b) of Code Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A., an amount equal to not less
than 50 percent of the total amount of taxes collected that exceeds the amount of taxes
that would be collected at the rate of 5 percent shall be expended for promoting tourism,
conventions, and trade shows by the destination marketing organization designated by
Hancock County or by such other entity already authorized to administer tourism funds
pursuant to an existing contract as specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Code
Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A.; and
(2) The remaining amount of taxes collected that exceeds the amount of taxes that would
be collected at the rate of 5 percent which is not otherwise expended under paragraph (1)
of this section shall be expended for tourism product development.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 349
- 2 -